North Carolina, session 2025, HB639.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. G.S. 116-11 is amended by adding the following new subdivision to
read:
"(8c) The Board of Governors shall adopt a policy requiring all educator preparation
programs of constituent institutions of The University of North Carolina to
give first priority for admission to applicants who qualify as residents for
tuition purposes under the criteria set forth in G.S. 116-143.1 and in
accordance with the coordinated and centralized residency determination
process administered by the Authority."
SECTION 2. This act is effective when it becomes law and applies beginning with
applications for admission to an educator preparation program in the 2025-2026 academic year.
*H639-v-1*